Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.047

Sheriff to take possession of property.

(1) After receiving an order awarding possession, the sheriff shall take possession of the property. If the property or any part of it is concealed in a building or enclosure, the sheriff shall publicly demand delivery of the property. If the property is not delivered and if the order awarding possession so directs, the sheriff shall cause the building or enclosure to be broken open and take possession of the property.

(2) At the time of taking possession of the property, the sheriff shall serve copies of the bond and the order awarding possession on the defendant or, if someone other than the defendant is in possession of the property, shall serve the copies on that person. If the copies of the bond and the order are not served on the defendant at the time of taking possession, the sheriff shall, within a reasonable time after taking possession, give notice to the defendant either by serving copies of the bond and order on the defendant in the same manner as a summons in a civil action or by causing the copies to be mailed to the defendant by both regular mail and certified mail, return receipt requested.

(3) As soon as possible after taking possession of the property and after receiving lawful fees for taking possession and necessary expenses for keeping the property, the sheriff shall release the property to the plaintiff, unless before the release the defendant has, as provided in RCW 7.64.050, given a redelivery bond to the sheriff or filed a redelivery bond with the court and notified the sheriff of that fact.

[ 1990 c 227 s 5.]